Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.510

Institutions of higher education—Designation of personnel officer.

Each institution of higher education and each related board shall designate an officer who shall perform duties as personnel officer. The personnel officer at each institution or related board shall direct, supervise, and manage administrative and technical personnel activities for the classified service at the institution or related board consistent with policies established by the institution or related board and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter. Institutions may undertake jointly with one or more other institutions to appoint a person qualified to perform the duties of personnel officer, provide staff and financial support and may engage consultants to assist in the performance of specific projects. The services of the department of enterprise services and the office of financial management may also be used by the institutions or related boards pursuant to RCW 41.06.080.

The state board for community and technical colleges shall have general supervision and control over activities undertaken by the various community colleges pursuant to this section.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 428; 1993 c 281 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.